Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 2. Jurisdiction in Civil Actions.

§ 16.1-77.
Civil jurisdiction of general district courts; amending amount of claim.

Except as provided in Article 5 (§

16.1-122.1

et seq.), each general district court shall have, within the limits of the territory it serves, civil jurisdiction as follows:

Exclusive original jurisdiction of (i) any claim to specific personal property or to any debt, fine or other money, or to damages for breach of contract or for injury done to property, real or personal, when the amount of such claim does not exceed $4,500, exclusive of interest and any attorney fees, and concurrent jurisdiction with the circuit courts having jurisdiction in such territory of any such claim when the amount thereof exceeds $4,500 but does not exceed $25,000, exclusive of interest and any attorney fees, and (ii) any action for injury to person, regardless of theory, and any action for wrongful death as provided for in Article 5 (§

8.01-50

et seq.) of Chapter 3 of Title 8.01 when the amount of such claim does not exceed $4,500, exclusive of interest and any attorney fees, and concurrent jurisdiction with the circuit courts having jurisdiction in such territory of any such claim when the amount thereof exceeds $4,500 but does not exceed $50,000, exclusive of interest and any attorney fees. However, the jurisdictional limit shall not apply with respect to distress warrants under the provisions of §

8.01-130.4

, cases involving liquidated damages for violations of vehicle weight limits pursuant to §

46.2-1135

, nor cases involving forfeiture of a bond pursuant to §

19.2-143

. While a matter is pending in a general district court, upon motion of the plaintiff seeking to increase the amount of the claim, the court shall order transfer of the matter to the circuit court that has jurisdiction over the amended amount of the claim without requiring that the case first be dismissed or that the plaintiff suffer a nonsuit, and the tolling of the applicable statutes of limitations governing the pending matter shall be unaffected by the transfer. Except for good cause shown, no such order of transfer shall issue unless the motion to amend and transfer is made at least 10 days before trial. The plaintiff shall pay filing and other fees as otherwise provided by law to the clerk of the court to which the case is transferred, and such clerk shall process the claim as if it were a new civil action. The plaintiff shall prepare and present the order of transfer to the transferring court for entry, after which time the case shall be removed from the pending docket of the transferring court and the order of transfer placed among its records. The plaintiff shall provide a certified copy of the transfer order to the receiving court.

Jurisdiction to try and decide attachment cases when the amount of the plaintiff’s claim does not exceed $25,000 exclusive of interest and any attorney fees.

Jurisdiction of actions of unlawful entry or detainer as provided in Article 13 (§

8.01-124

et seq.) of Chapter 3 of Title 8.01, and in Chapter 14 (§

55.1-1400

et seq.) of Title 55.1, and the maximum jurisdictional limits prescribed in subdivision (1) shall not apply to any claim, counter-claim or cross-claim in an unlawful detainer action that includes a claim for damages sustained or rent against any person obligated on the lease or guarantee of such lease.

Except where otherwise specifically provided, all jurisdiction, power and authority over any civil action or proceeding conferred upon any general district court judge or magistrate under or by virtue of any provisions of the Code.

Jurisdiction to try and decide suits in interpleader involving personal or real property where the amount of money or value of the property is not more than the maximum jurisdictional limits of the general district court. However, the maximum jurisdictional limits prescribed in subdivision (1) shall not apply to any claim, counter-claim, or cross-claim in an interpleader action that is limited to the disposition of an earnest money deposit pursuant to a real estate purchase contract. The action shall be brought in accordance with the procedures for interpleader as set forth in §

8.01-364

. However, the general district court shall not have any power to issue injunctions. Actions in interpleader may be brought by either the stakeholder or any of the claimants. The initial pleading shall be either by motion for judgment, by warrant in debt, or by other uniform court form established by the Supreme Court of Virginia. The initial pleading shall briefly set forth the circumstances of the claim and shall name as defendant all parties in interest who are not parties plaintiff.

Jurisdiction to try and decide any cases pursuant to §

2.2-3713

of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.) or §

2.2-3809

of the Government Data Collection and Dissemination Practices Act (§

2.2-3800

et seq.), for writs of mandamus or for injunctions.

Jurisdiction to try and decide any cases pursuant to §

55.1-1819

of the Property Owners’ Association Act (§

55.1-1800

et seq.) or §

55.1-1959

of the Virginia Condominium Act (§

55.1-1900

et seq.).

Concurrent jurisdiction with the circuit courts to submit matters to arbitration pursuant to Chapter 21 (§

8.01-577

et seq.) of Title 8.01 where the amount in controversy is within the jurisdictional limits of the general district court. Any party that disagrees with an order by a general district court granting an application to compel arbitration may appeal such decision to the circuit court pursuant to §

8.01-581.016

.For purposes of this section, the territory served by a county general district court expressly authorized by statute to be established in a city includes the general district court courtroom.

History.

1956, c. 555; 1968, c. 5; 1973, c. 440; 1978, c. 40; 1981, c. 404; 1983, c. 616; 1987, cc. 87, 93; 1988, c. 799; 1990, cc. 217, 471; 1991, c. 135; 1992, cc. 111, 777; 1995, c. 799; 1997, c. 753; 1998, cc. 482, 495; 1999, cc. 945, 987; 2001, cc. 473, 477; 2002, cc. 200, 506, 645; 2004, cc. 344, 460; 2008, cc. 840, 843; 2009, c. 663; 2010, c. 181; 2011, cc. 14, 76, 372, 378, 702; 2016, c. 181; 2017, c. 657; 2019, cc. 240, 787; 2020, cc. 898, 899; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 199, 463.

Cross references.

As to constitutional authority to establish and regulate jurisdiction of inferior courts, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 14.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1988, c. 799, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 1990, c. 565, cl. 1, Acts 1993, c. 593, cl. 1, and Acts 1997, c. 253, cl. 1, provides that the provisions of the 1988 act, which, in part, amended this section, shall become effective October 1, 1988, and no longer expire, as provided for in the original legislation.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitutions were made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “8.01-130.4” for “55-230,” “Chapter 14 (§

55.1-1400

et seq.) of Title 55.1” for “Chapter 13 (§ 55-217 et seq.) of Title 55” and “§

55.1-1819

of the Property Owners’ Association Act (§

55.1-1800

et seq.) or §

55.1-1959

of the Virginia Condominium Act (§

55.1-1900

et seq.)” for “§ 55-79.80:2 of the Condominium Act (§ 55-79.39 et seq.) or § 55-513 of the Property Owners’ Association Act (§ 55-508 et seq.).”

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendments by cc. 482 and 495 are identical, and substituted “$3,000” for “$1,000” in two places in subdivision (1).

The 1999 amendment

The 1999 amendments by cc. 945 and 987 are identical, and substituted “(§

46.2-355.1

et seq.)” for “(§

46.2-351

et seq.)” in subdivision (7).

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 473 and 477, effective October 1, 2001, are identical, and added subdivision (8).

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 200 and 506 are identical, and in subdivision (1), substituted “person that” for “person, which” in the first sentence and added “nor shall it apply to cases involving liquidated damages for violations of vehicle weight limits pursuant to §

46.2-1135

” at the end of the second sentence; and at the beginning of subdivision (8), deleted the parenthetical “(Effective October 1, 2001).”

The 2002 amendment by c. 645 substituted “$4,500” for “$3,000” twice in subdivision 1.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 344, in subdivision (3), inserted “counter-claim or cross-claim in an action” near the middle in the first sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2004 amendment by c. 460, in subdivision (1), in the last sentence, deleted “nor shall it apply to” following “§ 55-230” and inserted “nor cases involving forfeiture of a bond pursuant to §

19.2-143

” at the end.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 840 and 843, effective July 1, 2010, are identical, and inserted “or §

2.2-3809

of the Government Data Collection and Dissemination Practices Act” in subdivision (6).

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 663, in subdivision (3), in the first sentence, inserted “an unlawful detainer,” “that includes a claim” and “against any person obligated on the lease.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 181, in subdivision (5), added the second sentence, added “or by other uniform court form established by the Supreme Court of Virginia” to the end of the fifth sentence, and made a related change.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 14 and 702 are identical, and in subdivision (1), twice substituted “$25,000” for “$15,000”; and in subdivision (2), substituted “$25,000” for “$15,000.”

The 2011 amendment by c. 76, in subdivision (3), in the first sentence, deleted “proved to be owning where the premises were used by the occupant primarily for business, commercial or agricultural purposes” from the end and added “or guarantee of such lease,” and deleted the last sentence, which read: “Any counter-claim or cross-claim shall arise out of the same use of the property for business, commercial or agricultural purposes.”

The 2011 amendments by cc. 372 and 378 are identical, and added subdivision (9).

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 181 deleted “of this chapter” following “(§

16.1-122.1

et seq.)” in the introductory paragraph; in subdivision (4), deleted “of Virginia” at the end; in subdivision (6), inserted “(§

2.2-3800

et seq.)”; and added subdivision (10).

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 657 substituted “attorney fees” for “attorney’s fees contracted for in the instrument” throughout subdivisions (1) and (2).

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 240 added the last paragraph.

The 2019 amendment by c. 787 added the last five sentences to subdivision (1).

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 898 and 899 are identical, and deleted the existing provisions of subdivision (8), which read “Jurisdiction to try and decide cases alleging a civil violation described in §

18.2-76

.” and redesignated accordingly.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 199, effective July 1, 2021, in subdivision (1), inserted the clause (i) designation, deleted “or for any injury to the person that would be recoverable by action at law or suit in equity” following “real or personal” therein, and added clause (ii) in the first sentence, and substituted “the jurisdictional” for “this $25,000” in the second sentence; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 463, effective July 1, 2021, deleted former subdivision (7), which read: “Concurrent jurisdiction with the circuit courts having jurisdiction in such territory to adjudicate habitual offenders pursuant to the provisions of Article 9 (§

46.2-355.1

et seq.) of Chapter 3 of Title 46.2,” and redesignated the remaining subdivisions according.

Law Review.

For note, “Obtaining Jurisdiction Over Corporations in Virginia,” see 12 U. Rich. L. Rev. 369 (1978).

For article, “Appeal De Novo in Virginia: An Examination of Its Present Utility,” see 42 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1149 (1985).

For article, “Civil Rights and ‘Personal Injuries’: Virginia’s Statute of Limitations for Section 1983 Suits,” see 26 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 199 (1985).

For survey on civil procedure and practice in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 511 (1989).

For 2003/2004 survey of civil practice and procedure, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 87 (2004).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Actions, § 2; 2A M.J. Assumpsit, § 2; 5A M.J. Covenant, Action of, § 1; 5C M.J. Debt, Action of, § 1; 13A M.J. Motions for Judgment, § 2.

§ 16.1-77.1.
When general district court may give judgment on forthcoming bond.

A general district court may, on motion, after 10 days’ notice of the time and place thereof, give judgment on any forthcoming bond taken by a sheriff or other officer upon a fieri facias issued by such court.

History.

Code 1950, § 8-457; 1977, c. 624; 1983, c. 616; 2007, c. 869.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 869 deleted the second sentence, which read: “Any such case meeting the requirements of §

16.1-92

may be removed to the circuit court in accordance with the procedures prescribed by that section,” and made stylistic changes.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8B M.J. Forthcoming and Delivery Bonds, § 27.

§ 16.1-77.2.
Jurisdiction of partition of personal property and proceedings therefor.

Every general district court shall have jurisdiction of proceedings for partition of personal property, within the limits as to value and in accordance with the provisions hereinafter contained.

When joint owners of personal property of the value of more than $20 but not more than maximum jurisdictional limits of the court as provided in §

16.1-77 (1)

cannot agree upon a partition thereof, any party in interest may compel partition, the proceeding for which shall be commenced by a petition presented to a general district court as prescribed in subdivision 5 of §

8.01-262

. A copy of the petition, together with a notice of the time and place the petitioner will ask for a hearing thereon, shall be served on each of the defendants at least 10 days prior to the day of hearing. The court shall hear and decide the matter without the appointment or use of commissioners.

Any party aggrieved by a final judgment rendered by the general district court in any such proceeding shall have an appeal of right to any circuit court of the county or city having jurisdiction of appeals from such general district court, to be perfected within the time, and in all other respects in accordance with the provisions of law concerning appeals from general district courts in other civil cases.

History.

Code 1950, § 8-703; 1952, c. 252; 1972, c. 368; 1977, c. 624; 1983, c. 616; 2007, c. 869.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 869 deleted the former third paragraph, which read: “Any such case meeting the requirements of §

16.1-92

may be removed to the circuit court in accordance with procedures prescribed by that section.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Cotenancy, § 45.

§ 16.1-78.
Judgment by confession not affected.

None of the provisions of §

16.1-77

shall affect the right of any person to obtain judgment by confession in any court of record having jurisdiction thereof, or in the clerk’s office of any such court, when such right exists under some other statute or act, on any claim for money, property or damages, regardless of the amount of such claim for money or damages or the value of such property.

History.

1956, c. 555.